California statutes. Labor Code
(e) Unless the lien is satisfied or released, a lien under this section shall continue until 10 years from the date
 of its creation. The lien may be renewed for additional periods of 10 years by recording a renewal of certificate of lien or a copy of a renewed judgment at any time prior to its expiration.

(f) The provisions of Section 697.410 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to a lien created under this section as if the lien had been created by a recorded abstract of a money judgment or certified copy of a money judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (SB 572)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

91.

Any person who willfully impedes or prevents the Labor Commissioner or his deputies or agents in the performance of duty, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for not less than seven nor more than 30 days in the county jail, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 189.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

92.

The Labor Commissioner, his deputies and agents, may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and parties and the production of books, papers and records; administer oaths; examine witnesses under oath; take the verification, acknowledgment, or proof of written instruments; and take depositions and affidavits for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this code and all laws which the division is to enforce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 97.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

93.

Obedience to subpoenas issued by the Labor Commissioner, or his deputies or agents shall be enforced by the courts. It is a misdemeanor to ignore willfully such a subpoena if it calls for an appearance at a distance from the place of service of 100 miles, or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

94.

The office of the division shall be open for business from 9 o'clock a.m. until 5 o'clock p.m. every day except nonjudicial days, and the officers thereof shall give to all persons requesting it all needed information which they may possess.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

95.

(a) The division may enforce the provisions of this code and all labor laws of the state the enforcement of which is not specifically vested in any other officer, board or commission. Except as provided in subdivision (d), in the enforcement of such provisions and laws, the director, deputy director, and such officers and employees as the director may designate, shall only have the authority, as public officers, to arrest without a warrant, any person who, in his presence, has violated or as to whom there is probable cause to believe has violated any of such provisions and laws.

In any case in which an arrest authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting officer may, instead of taking such person before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.6) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The provisions of such chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(b) There shall be no civil liability on the part of and no cause of action shall arise against any person, acting pursuant to this section and within the scope of his authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest which is lawful or which the arresting officer, at the time of such arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful. No such officer shall be deemed an aggressor or lose his right to self-defense by the use of reasonable force to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance.

(c) The director, deputy director, and such officers and employees as the director may designate, may serve all processes and notices throughout the state.

(d) With respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this code and other labor laws as provided in subdivision (a), all officers and employees designated by the Labor Commissioner as investigators, shall have the authority of peace officers to make arrests, and may serve processes and notices as provided in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------

96.

The Labor Commissioner and the deputies and representatives authorized by the commissioner in writing shall, upon the filing of a claim therefor by an employee, or an employee representative authorized in writing by an employee, with the Labor Commissioner, take assignments of:

(a) Wage claims and incidental expense accounts and advances.

(b) Mechanics’ and other liens of employees.

(c) Claims based on “stop orders” for wages and on bonds for labor.

(d) Claims for damages for misrepresentations of conditions of employment.

(e) Claims for unreturned bond money of employees.

(f) Claims for penalties for nonpayment of wages.

(g) Claims for the return of workers’ tools in the illegal possession of another person.

(h) Claims for vacation pay, severance pay, or other compensation supplemental to a wage agreement.

(i) Awards for workers’ compensation benefits in which the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board has found that the employer has failed to secure payment of compensation and where the award remains unpaid more than 10 days after having become final.

(j) Claims for loss of wages as the result of discharge from employment for the garnishment of
 wages.

(k) Claims for loss of wages as the result of demotion, suspension, or discharge from employment for lawful conduct occurring during nonworking hours away from the employer’s premises.

(l) Claims for violations of standards issued by the Fast Food Council pursuant to Part 4.5.5 (commencing with Section 1470) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 246, Sec. 3.   (AB 257)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

96.1.

(a) By March 1, 2022, and by that date annually thereafter, the division shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the budget committees and relevant policy committees of the Legislature that includes the following information pertaining to the prior calendar year:

(1) The number of wage claims submitted.

(2) The number and type of alleged labor law violations in those claims.

(3) The average estimated prehearing amounts of unpaid wages, penalties, and other demands for compensation, including, but not limited to, liquidated damages.

(4) The
 total of unpaid wages, penalties, and other compensation, including, but not limited to, liquidated damages, agreed to in settlements enforceable by the Labor Commissioner.

(5) The total of unpaid wages, penalties, and other compensation, including, but not limited to, liquidated damages, payable to aggrieved employees under orders, decisions, and awards issued during the reporting year pursuant to Section 98.

(6) The total amount of wages, penalties, and other compensation, including, but not limited to, liquidated damages, arising from orders, decisions, and awards issued during the reporting year that remain unpaid.

(b) The information provided in subdivision (a) shall also be broken down by industry sectors.

(c) The division shall also include in
 each annual report a discussion of the major challenges to adjudicating wage claims, ongoing efforts to address those challenges, and options to improve the state’s wage claim process.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 6.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

96.3.

In cases where employees are covered by a collective bargaining agreement, the collective bargaining representative by virtue of such agreement may be the assignee of all such covered employees for purposes of filing claims for wages with the Labor Commissioner, subject to the option of the employee to reject such representation and to represent himself or herself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1029.)
-------------------------------------------

96.5.

The Labor Commissioner shall conduct such hearings as may be necessary for the purpose of Section 7071.11 of the Business and Professions Code. In any action to recover upon a cash deposit after a determination made under Section 7071.11, the Labor Commissioner shall certify in writing to the appropriate court that he has heard and determined the validity of claims and demands and that the sum specified therein is the amount found due and payable. The certificate of the commissioner shall be considered by the court but shall not, by itself, be sufficient evidence to support a judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

96.6.

The Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury, which is continuously appropriated for the purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 96.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 714.)
-------------------------------------------

96.7.

The Labor Commissioner, after investigation and upon determination that wages or monetary benefits are due and unpaid to any worker in the State of California, may collect such wages or benefits on behalf of the worker without assignment of such wages or benefits to the commissioner.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall act as trustee of all such collected unpaid wages or benefits, and shall deposit such collected moneys in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund.

(b) The Labor Commissioner shall make a diligent search to locate any worker for whom the Labor Commissioner has collected unpaid wages or benefits.

(c) All wages or benefits collected under this section shall be remitted to the worker, his lawful representative, or to any trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health and welfare, pension, vacation, retirement, or similar benefits from the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund.

(d) Any unpaid wages or benefits collected by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be retained in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund until remitted pursuant to subdivision (c), or until deposited in the General Fund.

(e) The Controller shall, at the end of each fiscal year, transfer to the General Fund the unencumbered balance, less six months of expenditures as determined by the Director of Finance, in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund.

(f) All wages or benefits collected under this section which cannot be remitted from the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund pursuant to subdivision (c) because money has been transmitted to the General Fund shall be paid out of the General Fund from funds appropriated for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 54.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

96.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, beginning 20 days after a judgment is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in favor of the Labor Commissioner, or in favor of any employee pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 98.2, the Labor Commissioner may, with the consent of any employee in whose favor the judgment is entered, collect any outstanding amount of the judgment by mailing a notice of levy upon all persons having in their possession, or who will have in their possession or under their control, any credits, money, or property belonging to the judgment debtor, or who owe any debt to the judgment debtor at the time they receive the notice of levy.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Labor
 Commissioner may execute a levy on any property that may be levied under Section 700.140, 700.150, 700.160, or 700.170 of the Code of Civil Procedure by mailing a notice of levy to the person against whom the levy is directed and serving a copy on the judgment debtor. The notice of levy shall contain all of the information required to be included in a writ of execution under Section 699.520 of the Code of Civil Procedure and in a notice of levy under Section 699.540 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Any person, upon whom a levy has been noticed having in his or her possession or under his or her control any credits, money, or property belonging to the judgment debtor or owing any debts to the judgment debtor at the time of receipt of the levy or coming into his or her possession or under his or her control within one year of receipt of the notice of levy, shall surrender the credits, money, or property to the Labor Commissioner or pay to the
 Labor Commissioner the amount of any debt owed to the judgment debtor within 10 days of service of the levy, and shall surrender the credits or property, or the amount of any debt owing to the judgment debtor coming into his or her own possession or control within one year of receipt of the notice of levy within 10 days of the date of coming into possession or control of the credits or property or the amount of any debt owed to the judgment debtor.

(d) Any person who surrenders to the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section any credits, money, or property, or pays the debts owed to the judgment debtor, shall be discharged from any obligation or liability to the judgment debtor to the extent of the amount paid to the Labor Commissioner as a result of the levy.

(e) If the levy is made on a deposit or credits, money, or property in the possession or under the control of a bank,
 savings and loan association, or other financial institution as defined by Section 669a(d)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the notice of levy may be delivered or mailed to a centralized location designated by the bank, savings and loan association, or other financial institution pursuant to Section 690.050 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) Any person who is noticed with a levy pursuant to this section and who fails or refuses to surrender any credits, money, or property or pay any debts owed to the judgment debtor shall be liable in his or her own person or estate to the Labor Commissioner in an amount equal to the value of the credits, money, or other property or in the amount of the levy, up to the amount specified in the levy.

(g) The fees, commissions, expenses, and the reasonable costs associated with the sale of property levied upon by warrant or levy pursuant to
 this section, including, but not limited to, appraisers’ fees, auctioneers’ fees, and advertising fees are an obligation of the judgment debtor and may be collected from the judgment debtor by virtue of the warrant or levy or in any other manner as though these items were part of the judgment or award outstanding.

(h) This section shall not apply to the judgment debtor’s interest in real property.

(i) This section shall not apply if enforcement of the judgment has been stayed on appeal pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 916) of Title 13 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

97.

The Labor Commissioner, his deputies and representatives shall not be bound by any rule requiring the consent of the spouse of a married claimant, the filing of a lien for record before it is assigned, or prohibiting the assignment of a claim for penalty before the claim has been incurred or any other technical rule with reference to the validity of assignments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

98.

(a) The Labor Commissioner is authorized to investigate employee complaints. The Labor Commissioner may provide for a hearing in any action to recover wages, penalties, and other demands for compensation, including liquidated damages if the complaint alleges payment of a wage less than the minimum wage fixed by an order of the Industrial Welfare Commission or by statute, properly before the division or the Labor Commissioner, including orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and shall determine all matters arising under his or her jurisdiction. The Labor Commissioner may also provide for a hearing to recover civil penalties due pursuant to Section 558 against any employer or other person acting on behalf of an employer, including, but not limited to, an individual liable pursuant to
 Section 558.1. It is within the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner to accept and determine claims from holders of payroll checks or payroll drafts returned unpaid because of insufficient funds, if, after a diligent search, the holder is unable to return the dishonored check or draft to the payee and recover the sums paid out. Within 30 days of the filing of the complaint, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the parties as to whether a hearing will be held, whether action will be taken in accordance with Section 98.3, or whether no further action will be taken on the complaint. If the determination is made by the Labor Commissioner to hold a hearing, the hearing shall be held within 90 days of the date of that determination. However, the Labor Commissioner may postpone or grant additional time before setting a hearing if the Labor Commissioner finds that it would lead to an equitable and just resolution of the dispute. A party who has received actual notice of a claim before the Labor Commissioner shall,
 while the matter is before the Labor Commissioner, notify the Labor Commissioner in writing of any change in that party’s business or personal address within 10 days after the change in address occurs.

It is the intent of the Legislature that hearings held pursuant to this section be conducted in an informal setting preserving the rights of the parties.

(b) When a hearing is set, a copy of the complaint, which shall include the amount of compensation requested, together with a notice of time and place of the hearing, shall be served on all parties, personally or by certified mail, or in the manner specified in Section 415.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Within 10 days after service of the notice and the complaint, a defendant may file an answer with the Labor Commissioner in any form as the Labor Commissioner may prescribe, setting
 forth the particulars in which the complaint is inaccurate or incomplete and the facts upon which the defendant intends to rely.

(d) No pleading other than the complaint and answer of the defendant or defendants shall be required. Both shall be in writing and shall conform to the form and the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the Labor Commissioner.

(e) Evidence on matters not pleaded in the answer shall be allowed only on terms and conditions the Labor Commissioner shall impose. In all these cases, the claimant shall be entitled to a continuance for purposes of review of the new evidence.

(f) If the defendant fails to appear or answer within the time allowed under this chapter, no default shall be taken against him or her, but the Labor Commissioner shall hear the evidence offered and shall issue an order,
 decision, or award in accordance with the evidence. A defendant failing to appear or answer, or subsequently contending to be aggrieved in any manner by want of notice of the pendency of the proceedings, may apply to the Labor Commissioner for relief in accordance with Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The Labor Commissioner may afford this relief. No right to relief, including the claim that the findings or award of the Labor Commissioner or judgment entered thereon are void upon their face, shall accrue to the defendant in any court unless prior application is made to the Labor Commissioner in accordance with this chapter.

(g) All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter are governed by the division and by the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the Labor Commissioner.

(h) (1) Whenever a claim is filed under this chapter against a person
 operating or doing business under a fictitious business name, as defined in Section 17900 of the Business and Professions Code, which relates to the person’s business, the division shall inquire at the time of the hearing whether the name of the person is the legal name under which the business or person has been licensed, registered, incorporated, or otherwise authorized to do business.

(2) The division may amend an order, decision, or award to conform to the legal name of the business or the person who is the defendant to a wage claim, if it can be shown that proper service was made on the defendant or his or her agent, unless a judgment had been entered on the order, decision, or award pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 98.2. The Labor Commissioner may apply to the clerk of the superior court to amend a judgment that has been issued pursuant to a final order, decision, or award to conform to the legal name of the defendant, if it can be
 shown that proper service was made on the defendant or his or her agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 3.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

98.1.

(a) Within 15 days after the hearing is concluded, the Labor Commissioner shall file in the office of the division a copy of the order, decision, or award. The order, decision, or award shall include a summary of the hearing and the reasons for the decision. Upon filing of the order, decision, or award, the Labor Commissioner shall serve a copy of the decision personally, by first-class mail, or in the manner specified in Section 415.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure on the parties. The notice shall also advise the parties of their right to appeal the decision or award and further advise the parties that failure to do so within the period prescribed by this chapter shall result in the decision or award becoming final and enforceable as a judgment by the superior court.

(b) For the purpose of this section, an award shall include any sums found owing, damages proved, and any penalties awarded pursuant to this code.

(c) All awards granted pursuant to a hearing under this chapter shall accrue interest on all due and unpaid wages at the same rate as prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code. The interest shall accrue until the wages are paid from the date that the wages were due and payable as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 405, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

98.2.

(a) Within 10 days after service of notice of an order, decision, or award, the parties may seek review by filing an appeal to the superior court, where the appeal shall be heard de novo. The court shall charge the first paper filing fee under Section 70611 of the Government Code to the party seeking review. The fee shall be distributed as provided in Section 68085.3 of the Government Code. A copy of the appeal request shall be served upon the Labor Commissioner by the appellant. For purposes of computing the 10-day period after service, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure is applicable.

(b) As a condition to filing an appeal pursuant to this section, an employer shall first
 post an undertaking with the reviewing court in the amount of the order, decision, or award. The undertaking shall consist of an appeal bond issued by a licensed surety or a cash deposit with the court in the amount of the order, decision, or award. The employer shall provide written notification to the other parties and the Labor Commissioner of the posting of the undertaking. The undertaking shall be on the condition that, if any judgment is entered in favor of the employee, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the judgment, and if the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed without entry of judgment, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the order, decision, or award of the Labor Commissioner unless the parties have executed a settlement agreement for payment of some other amount, in which case the employer shall pay the amount that the employer is obligated to pay under the
 terms of the settlement agreement. If the employer fails to pay the amount owed within 10 days of entry of the judgment, dismissal, or withdrawal of the appeal, or the execution of a settlement agreement, a portion of the undertaking equal to the amount owed, or the entire undertaking if the amount owed exceeds the undertaking, is forfeited to the employee.

(c) If the party seeking review by filing an appeal to the superior court is unsuccessful in the appeal, the court shall determine the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the other parties to the appeal, and assess that amount as a cost upon the party filing the appeal. An employee is successful if the court awards an amount greater than zero.

(d) If no notice of appeal of the order, decision, or award is filed within
 the period set forth in subdivision (a), the order, decision, or award shall, in the absence of fraud, be deemed the final order.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall file, within 10 days of the order becoming final pursuant to subdivision (d), a certified copy of the final order with the clerk of the superior court of the appropriate county unless a settlement has been reached by the parties and approved by the Labor Commissioner. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the court clerk in conformity therewith. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all of the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered. Enforcement of the judgment shall receive court priority.

(f) (1) In order to ensure that judgments are satisfied, the Labor Commissioner may serve upon the judgment debtor, personally or by first-class mail at the last known address of the judgment debtor listed with the division, a form similar to, and requiring the reporting of the same information as, the form approved or adopted by the Judicial Council for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 116.830 of the Code of Civil Procedure to assist in identifying the nature and location of any assets of the judgment debtor.

(2) The judgment debtor shall complete the form and cause it to be delivered to the division at the address listed on the form within 35 days after the form has been served on the judgment debtor, unless the judgment has been satisfied. In the case of a willful failure by the judgment debtor to comply
 with this subdivision, the division or the judgment creditor may request the court to apply the sanctions provided in Section 708.170 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) (1) As an alternative to a judgment lien, upon the order becoming final pursuant to subdivision (d), a lien on real property may be created by the Labor Commissioner recording a certificate of lien, for amounts due under the final order and in favor of the employee or employees named in the order, with the county recorder of any county in which the employer’s real property may be located, at the Labor Commissioner’s discretion and depending upon information the Labor Commissioner obtains concerning the employer’s assets. The lien attaches to all interests in real property of the employer located in the county where the lien is created to which a
 judgment lien may attach pursuant to Section 697.340 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) The certificate of lien shall include information as prescribed by Section 27288.1 of the Government Code.

(3) The recorder shall accept and record the certificate of lien and shall index it as prescribed by law.

(4) Upon payment of the amount due under the final order, the Labor Commissioner shall issue a certificate of release, releasing the lien created under paragraph (1). The certificate of release may be recorded by the employer at the employer’s expense.

(5) Unless the lien is satisfied or released, a lien under this section shall continue until 10 years from the date of
 its creation.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), the Labor Commissioner may stay execution of any judgment entered upon an order, decision, or award that has become final upon good cause appearing therefor and may impose the terms and conditions of the stay of execution. A certified copy of the stay of execution shall be filed with the clerk entering the judgment.

(i) When a judgment is satisfied in fact, other than by execution, the Labor Commissioner may, upon the motion of either party or on its own motion, order entry of satisfaction of judgment. The clerk of the court shall enter a satisfaction of judgment upon the filing of a certified copy of the order.

(j) The Labor Commissioner shall make every reasonable
 effort to ensure that judgments are satisfied, including taking all appropriate legal action and requiring the employer to deposit a bond as provided in Section 240.

(k) The judgment creditor, or the Labor Commissioner or a public prosecutor, as defined in Section 180, as assignee of the judgment creditor, shall be awarded court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees for enforcing the judgment that is rendered pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.   (SB 261)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

98.3.

(a) The Labor Commissioner may prosecute all actions for the collection of wages, penalties, and demands of persons who in the judgment of the Labor Commissioner are financially unable to employ counsel and the Labor Commissioner believes have claims which are valid and enforceable.

The Labor Commissioner may also prosecute actions for the return of worker’s tools which are in the illegal possession of another person.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may prosecute action for the collection of wages and other moneys payable to employees or to the state arising out of an employment relationship or order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(c) The Labor Commissioner may also prosecute actions for wages or other monetary benefits that are due the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

98.4.

(a) The Labor Commissioner may, upon the request of a claimant financially unable to afford counsel, represent such claimant in the de novo proceedings provided for in Section 98.2, notwithstanding whether such proceedings are held in a judicial or arbitral forum. In the event that such claimant is attempting to uphold the amount awarded by the Labor Commissioner and is not objecting to any part of the Labor Commissioner’s final order, the Labor Commissioner shall represent the claimant.

(b) A wage claimant unable to have their claim adjudicated and decided by the Labor Commissioner under Sections 98 and 98.1 as the result of entry of a court order compelling arbitration may request that the Labor Commissioner represent the
 claimant in the arbitral proceeding. The Labor Commissioner shall represent the claimant in the arbitral proceeding if the claimant is financially unable to afford counsel, and if the Labor Commissioner determines, upon conclusion of an informal investigation, that the claim has merit.

(c) A petition to compel arbitration of a claim that is pending under Section 98, 98.1 or 98.2 shall be served on the Labor Commissioner. Upon request of a claimant, the Labor Commissioner shall have the right to represent the claimant in proceedings to determine the enforceability of the arbitration agreement, notwithstanding whether the adjudication of the enforceability of the arbitration agreement is conducted in a judicial or arbitral forum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

98.5.

The Labor Commissioner shall have the right to intervene in any court proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 98.2 where questions of the interpretation of statutes or administrative regulations are present.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

98.6.

(a) A person shall not discharge an employee or in any manner discriminate, retaliate, or take any adverse action against any employee or applicant for employment because the employee or applicant engaged in any conduct delineated in this chapter, including the conduct described in subdivision (k) of Section 96, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1101) of Part 3 of Division 2, or because the employee or applicant for employment has filed a bona fide complaint or claim or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or relating to their rights that are under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner, made a written or oral complaint that they are owed unpaid wages, or because the employee has initiated any action or notice pursuant to Section 2699, or has testified or is about to testify in a proceeding pursuant
 to that section, or because of the exercise by the employee or applicant for employment on behalf of themselves or others of any rights afforded them.

(b) (1) Any employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, retaliated against, subjected to an adverse action, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of their employment because the employee engaged in any conduct delineated in this chapter, including the conduct described in subdivision (k) of Section 96, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1101) of Part 3 of Division 2, or because the employee has made a bona fide complaint or claim to the division pursuant to this part, or because the employee has initiated any action or notice pursuant to Section 2699 shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by those acts of the employer. If an employer engages in any
 action prohibited by this section within 90 days of the protected activity specified in this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption in favor of the employee’s claim.

(2) An employer who willfully refuses to hire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure, arbitration, or hearing authorized by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) In addition to other remedies available, an employer who violates this section is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee for each violation of this section, to be awarded to the employee or employees who suffered the violation.

(c) (1) Any applicant for employment who is refused employment, who is not
 selected for a training program leading to employment, or who in any other manner is discriminated against in the terms and conditions of any offer of employment because the applicant engaged in any conduct delineated in this chapter, including the conduct described in subdivision (k) of Section 96, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1101) of Part 3 of Division 2, or because the applicant has made a bona fide complaint or claim to the division pursuant to this part, or because the employee has initiated any action or notice pursuant to Section 2699 shall be entitled to employment and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the prospective employer.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed to invalidate any collective bargaining agreement that requires an applicant for a position that is subject to the collective bargaining agreement to sign a contract that protects either or both of the following as specified
 in subparagraphs (A) and (B), nor shall this subdivision be construed to invalidate any employer requirement of an applicant for a position that is not subject to a collective bargaining agreement to sign an employment contract that protects either or both of the following:

(A) An employer against any conduct that is actually in direct conflict with the essential enterprise-related interests of the employer and where breach of that contract would actually constitute a material and substantial disruption of the employer’s operation.

(B) A firefighter against any disease that is presumed to arise in the course and scope of employment, by limiting their consumption of tobacco products on and off the job.

(d) The provisions of this section creating new actions or remedies that are effective on January 1, 2002, to
 employees or applicants for employment do not apply to any state or local law enforcement agency, any religious association or corporation specified in subdivision (d) of Section 12926 of the Government Code, except as provided in Section 12926.2 of the Government Code, or any person described in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code.

(e) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee because the employee is a family member of a person who has, or is perceived to have, engaged in any conduct delineated in this chapter.

(f) For purposes of this section, “employer” or “a person acting on behalf of the employer” includes, but is not limited to, a client employer as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2810.3 and an employer listed in subdivision (b) of Section 6400.

(g) Subdivisions (e) and (f) shall not apply to claims arising under subdivision (k) of Section 96 unless the lawful conduct occurring during nonwork hours away from the employer’s premises involves the exercise of employee rights otherwise covered under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (SB 497)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

98.7.

(a) (1) Any person who believes that they have been discharged or otherwise discriminated against in violation of any law under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner may file a complaint with the division within one year after the occurrence of the violation. The
 one-year period may be extended for good cause. The complaint shall be investigated by a discrimination complaint investigator in accordance with this section. The Labor Commissioner shall establish procedures for the investigation of discrimination complaints, including, but not limited to, relief pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). A summary of the procedures shall be provided to each complainant and respondent at the time of initial contact. The Labor Commissioner shall inform complainants charging a violation of Section 6310 or 6311, at the time of initial contact, of the complainant’s right to file a separate, concurrent complaint with the United States Department of Labor within 30 days after the occurrence of the violation.
